Rhode Island, session 2025, SB293.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 12-13-1.3 of the General Laws in Chapter 12-13 entitled "Bail and
Recognizance" is hereby amended to read as follows:
12-13-1.3. Pretrial release.
(a)(1) Unless otherwise provided, a detainee shall be eligible for pretrial release or reduced
bail if he or she fails to post bail.
(2) If the arrested person is charged with no offense other than a misdemeanor, the court
may not impose financial conditions of release on the person unless the person is charged with a
domestic violence offense under chapter 29 of title 12; the person requests such financial
conditions; or the court makes a finding on the record that there is a likely risk that:
(i) The arrested person will fail to appear in the court, as required; or
(ii) The arrested person will obstruct or attempt to obstruct justice, or threaten, injure or
intimidate or attempt to threaten, injure or intimidate a prospective witness. In making a finding
described in this subsection, the court shall consider information it receives pursuant to § 12-13-
24.1.
(b) “Pretrial release” means release of a defendant without bail but upon an order to abide
by the conditions as set by the court. Release on non-monetary conditions shall be applied to secure
the presence of the accused and protect the safety of the community.
(c) The department of corrections shall collect information concerning the background and
circumstances of the pretrial detainee. The department’s investigation shall include the following

information and any other factors as shall be appropriate to the case:
(1) Marital status.
(2) Name and address of dependents.
(3) Past and present employment, including place of employment, position held and length
of employment.
(4) Whether the defendant is under the care of a licensed physician or uses medication
prescribed by a licensed physician.
(5) Any physical or mental condition affecting the defendant’s behavior.
(6) Education.
(7) Prior criminal record, including facts indicating that the defendant is likely to be a
danger to the community if released without restrictions.
(8) Prior court appearances and record of appearance or non-appearance.
(9) Ties to this community and to other communities.
(10) Financial resources.
(d) If, as a result of this investigation, the department of corrections concludes that the
pretrial detainee is an appropriate candidate to be considered by the court for pretrial release or
reduced bail, the department shall present its findings to the court.
(e) Upon a determination by the court that a defendant is suitable for release on
recognizance subject to conditions set by the court, the court in its discretion may also impose the
least onerous of the following conditions necessary to assure the defendant’s appearance in court:
(1) Imposition of condition of release involving field supervision with or without special
conditions. Field supervision shall require notification to defendants released prior to trial of their
court dates.
(2) Imposition of condition of release involving placement of defendant on intensive
supervision, with or without special conditions. Intensive supervision shall require contact with the
officials designated by the courts and prompt notification to the court of all apparent violations of
pre-trial release conditions or arrest of persons released to its custody.
(3) Imposition of a condition of release involving placement of the defendant on
community confinement pursuant to § 42-56-20.2.
(f) This section shall not be construed to preclude review by the court of a defendant’s bail
status at any time.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000665
========
LC000665 - Page 2 of 3